Missouri, session 2026, HB2931.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 305, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 305.280, to read as follows:
305.280. 1. An airport owned by a city not within a county and that receives
assistance from the federal government or the Missouri department of transportation,
or both, may use revenues generated by the airport and airport facilities.
2. Such revenues shall include, but not be limited to, any allocations creditable to
the general revenue fund of a city not within a county to be paid out of the gross receipts
derived from the operation of airports and airport facilities.
3. Such revenues shall not be expended for any purpose other than the capital or
operating costs of:
(1) The airport;
(2) The local airport system; or
(3) Any other local facility that is:
(a) Owned or operated by the individual or entity that owns or operates the
airport; and
(b) Directly and substantially related to the air transportation of passengers or
property.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.